Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-1181
Veterinarians;
agreement for services; contents; compensation; liability.

The State Veterinarian
shall make the designation of the veterinarians required by sections 54-1180
and 54-1182 by entering into an agreement with any accredited veterinarian
for his or her professional services in performing necessary inspections.
Such agreement shall provide that the State Veterinarian may terminate it
at any time for what he or she deems to be just cause and shall further provide
that the state pay such veterinarian a fee as established by section 54-1180,
which amount shall be paid monthly from the Livestock Auction Market Fund.
Such agreement shall make the designated veterinarian an agent for the Department
of Agriculture to perform the duties assigned by sections 54-1180 and 54-1182,
and the rules and regulations prescribed by the department, but shall not be deemed to make
the designated veterinarian an officer or employee of the state. The orders
of such designated veterinarian, issued in the performance of the duties assigned
under sections 54-1180 and 54-1182 and the rules and regulations prescribed
by the department, shall have the
same force and effect as though such order had been made by the State Veterinarian.
Designated veterinarians shall not be liable for reasonable acts performed
to carry out the duties as set forth in sections 54-1180 and 54-1182 and the
rules and regulations prescribed by the department pursuant
to such sections.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 25, p. 971;

Laws 1965, c. 334, § 6, p. 957;

Laws 1969, c. 454, § 2, p. 1544;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 21;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 31.